Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.490

Cooperation with other entities.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with other governmental agencies, whether of this state, other states, or agencies of the federal government, and with private associations, in order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 37.]